Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2392.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 65-1119 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
1119. (a) Application for approval. An approved school of nursing is one
which that has been approved as such by the board as meeting the
standards of this act, and the rules and regulations of the board. An
institution desiring to conduct an approved school of professional or
practical nursing shall apply to the board for approval and submit
satisfactory proof that it such school is prepared to and will maintain the
standards and basic professional nursing curriculum or the required
curriculum for practical nursing, as the case may be, as prescribed by this
act and by the rules and regulations of the board. Applications shall be
made in writing on forms supplied by the board and shall be submitted to
the board together with the application fee fixed by the board. The
approval of a school of nursing shall not exceed 10 years after the granting
of such approval by the board. An institution desiring to continue to
conduct an approved school of professional or practical nursing shall apply
to the board for the renewal of approval and submit satisfactory proof that
it such school will maintain the standards and basic professional nursing
curriculum or the required curriculum for practical nursing, as the case
may be, as prescribed by this act and by the rules and regulations of the
board. Applications for renewal of approval shall be made in writing on
forms supplied by the board. Each school of nursing shall submit annually
to the board an annual fee fixed by the board by rules and regulations to
maintain the approval status.
(b) Schools for professional nurses. To qualify as an approved school
for professional nurses, the school must shall be conducted in the state of
Kansas, and shall apply to the board and submit evidence that: (1) It Such
school is prepared to carry out the professional curriculum as prescribed in
the rules and regulations of the board; (2) such school's faculty possess a
nursing or directly related medical degree awarded by a state or

HB 2392—Am. by HCW 2
nationally accredited school of nursing or medical school approved by the
board that is at least one level more advanced than the degree awarded by
the program in which they are teaching. Additional or more advanced
credentials for faculty shall not be required {by the board}; and (2) it (3)
such school is prepared to meet such other standards as shall be
established by this law and the rules and regulations of the board.
(c) Schools for practical nurses. To qualify as an approved school for
practical nurses, the school must shall be conducted in the state of Kansas,
and shall apply to the board and submit evidence that: (1) It Such school is
prepared to carry out the curriculum as prescribed in the rules and
regulations of the board; (2) such school's faculty possess a nursing or
directly related medical degree awarded by a state or nationally
accredited school of nursing or medical school approved by the board that
is at least one level more advanced than the degree awarded by the
program in which they are teaching. Additional or more advanced
credentials for faculty shall not be required {by the board}; and (2) it (3)
such school is prepared to meet such other standards as shall be
established by this law and the rules and regulations of the board.
(d) Survey. The board shall prepare and maintain a list of approved
schools for both professional and practical nurses whose graduates, if they
have the other necessary qualifications provided in this act, shall be
eligible to apply for a license as a registered professional nurse or as a
licensed practical nurse. A survey of the institution or institutions and of
the schools applying for approval shall be made by an authorized
employee of the board or members of the board, who shall submit a
written report of the survey to the board. If, in the opinion of the board, the
requirements as prescribed by the board in its rules and regulations for an
approved school for professional nurses or for practical nurses are met, it
the board shall so approve the school as either a school for professional
nurses or practical nurses, as the case may be. The board shall resurvey
approved schools on a periodic basis as determined by rules and
regulations. If the board determines that any approved school of nursing is
not maintaining the standards required by this act and by rules and
regulations prescribed by the board, notice thereof in writing, specifying
the failures of such school, shall be given immediately to the school. A
school which that fails to correct such conditions to the satisfaction of the
board within a reasonable time shall be removed from the list of approved
schools of nursing until such time as the school shall comply complies
with the standards. All approved schools shall maintain accurate and
current records showing in full the theoretical and practical courses given
to each student.
(e) Providers of continuing nursing education. (1) To qualify as an
approved provider of continuing nursing education offerings, persons,

HB 2392—Am. by HCW 3
organizations or institutions proposing to provide such continuing nursing
education offerings shall apply to the board for approval and submit
evidence that the applicant is prepared to meet the standards and
requirements established by the rules and regulations of the board for such
continuing nursing education offerings. Initial applications shall be made
in writing on forms supplied by the board and shall be submitted to the
board together with the application fee fixed by the board.
(2) AAn "approved long-term provider" means a person, organization
or institution that is responsible for the development, administration and
evaluation of continuing nursing education programs and offerings and
that has been approved as qualified by the board. Qualification as a long-
term approved provider of continuing nursing education offerings shall
expire five years after the granting of such approval by the board. An
approved long-term provider of continuing nursing education offerings
shall submit annually to the board the annual fee established by rules and
regulations, along with an annual report for the previous fiscal year.
Applications for renewal as an approved long-term provider of continuing
nursing education offerings shall be made in writing on forms supplied by
the board.
(3) Qualification as an approved provider of a single continuing
nursing education offering, which may be offered once or multiple times,
shall expire two years after the granting of such approval by the board.
Approved single continuing nursing education providers shall not be
subject to an annual fee or annual report.
(4) In accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board, the
board may approve individual educational offerings for continuing nursing
education, which shall not be subject to approval under other subsections
of this section.
(5) The board shall accept offerings as approved continuing nursing
education presented by: colleges that are approved by a state or the
national department of education and providers approved by other state
boards of nursing, the national league for nursing, the national federation
of licensed practical nurses, the American nurses credentialing center or
other such such other national organizations as listed in rules and
regulations adopted by the board.
(6) An individual designated by a provider of continuing nursing
education offerings as an individual responsible for CNE who has held this
position for the provider at least five years immediately prior to January 1,
1997, shall not be required to have a baccalaureate or higher academic
degree in order to be designated by such provider as the individual
responsible for CNE.
(f) Criteria for evaluating out-of-state schools. For the purpose of
determining whether an applicant for licensure who is a graduate of a

HB 2392—Am. by HCW 4
school of professional or practical nursing located outside this state meets
the requirements of item (2) of subsection (a) of K.S.A. 65-1115(a)(2), and
amendments thereto, or the requirements of item (2) of subsection (a) of
K.S.A. 65-1116(a)(2), and amendments thereto, as appropriate, the board
by rules and regulations shall establish criteria for determining whether a
particular school of professional nursing located outside this state
maintains standards which that are at least equal to schools of professional
nursing which that are approved by the board and whether a particular
school of practical nursing located outside this state maintains standards
which that are at least equal to schools of practical nursing which that are
approved by the board. The board may send a questionnaire developed by
the board to any school of professional or practical nursing located outside
this state for which the board does not have sufficient information to
determine whether the school meets the standards established under this
subsection (f). The questionnaire providing the necessary information shall
be completed and returned to the board in order for the school to be
considered for approval. The board may contract with investigative
agencies, commissions or consultants to assist the board in obtaining
information about schools. In entering such contracts the authority to
approve schools shall remain solely with the board.
(g) The board may accept nationally accredited schools of nursing as
defined in rule and regulation.
(1) Schools of nursing which that have received accreditation from a
board recognized national nursing accreditation agency shall file evidence
of initial accreditation with the board and shall file all reports from the
accrediting agency and any notice of any change in school accreditation
status. The board may grant approval based upon evidence of such
accreditation.
(2) Schools of nursing holding approval based upon national
accreditation are also responsible for complying shall also comply with all
other requirements as determined by rules and regulations of the board.
(3) The board may grant approval to a school of nursing with national
accreditation for a continuing period not to exceed 10 years.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 65-1119 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.